District of Columbia statutes.
29A-101.27

Repealed

Voting of shares; exclusion of shares of corporation’s own stock; determination of number of outstanding shares.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 191, ch. 269, § 27
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-101.27.
1981 Ed., § 29-327.
1973 Ed., § 29-911.